incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="amha/rc__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rca</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irc</l>
          <r>rc<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="creid/eamh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eamh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eamh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eamha</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eamh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>imh</l>
          <r>eamh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ta/rbh__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rbha</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irbh</l>
          <r>rbh<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="saga/rt__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rta</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>irt</l>
          <r>rt<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="amharc"><par n="a_init"/><i>mha</i><par n="amha/rc__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tarbh"><par n="t_init"/><i>a</i><par n="ta/rbh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aireamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>ir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anchaitheamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>nchaith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aonsmaoineamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>onsmaoin</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athchaidreamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>thchaidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athchomhaireamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>thchomhair</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athsmaoineamh"><par n="a_init"/><i>thsmaoin</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baothchreideamh"><par n="b_init"/><i>aothchreid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="breitheamh"><par n="b_init"/><i>reith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buaireamh"><par n="b_init"/><i>uair</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bunsmaoineamh"><par n="b_init"/><i>unsmaoin</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caidreamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>aidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="caitheamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>aith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceartchreideamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>eartchreid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceisneamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>eisn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhaireamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhair</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="comhchaidreamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>omhchaidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="creideamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>reid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cuimhneamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>uimhn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cúiseamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>úis</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cúiteamh"><par n="c_init"/><i>úit</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dáileamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>áil</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="díchreideamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>íchreid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="díotchúiseamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>íotchúis</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dlúthchaidreamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>lúthchaidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dúileamh"><par n="d_init"/><i>úil</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="faoiseamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>aois</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="feitheamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>eith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fofhoirgneamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>ofhoirgn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foighneamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>oighn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foirgneamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>oirgn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foláireamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>oláir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fritháireamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>ritháir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="frithchaitheamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>rithchaith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuaidreamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>uaidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuaiscneamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>uaiscn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuidreamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>uidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuilleamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>uill</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fuinneamh"><par n="f_init"/><i>uinn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="gaineamh"><par n="g_init"/><i>ain</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="idirchaidreamh"><par n="i_init"/><i>dirchaidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intleamh"><par n="i_init"/><i>ntl</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ionchúiseamh"><par n="i_init"/><i>onchúis</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="léirsmaoineamh"><i>léirsmaoin</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="leorchúiteamh"><i>leorchúit</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maitheamh"><par n="m_init"/><i>aith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Meitheamh"><par n="m_init"/><i>eith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="míthaitneamh"><par n="m_init"/><i>íthaitn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="móráireamh"><par n="m_init"/><i>óráir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neamhthaitneamh"><i>neamhthaitn</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rinnfheitheamh"><i>rinnfheith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="róchaitheamh"><i>róchaith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sainchreideamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>ainchreid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saobhchreideamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>aobhchreid</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saorchaitheamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>aorchaith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scaitheamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>caith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="scráibchaitheamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>cráibchaith</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="seicheamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>eich</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="smaoineamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>maoin</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="staidreamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>taidr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stocáireamh"><par n="s_init"/><i>tocáir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taibhreamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>aibhr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="taibhseamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>aibhs</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tairiseamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>airis</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tinreamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>inr</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuilleamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>uill</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuireamh"><par n="t_init"/><i>uir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerfort"><par n="a_init"/><i>erfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ardsagart"><par n="a_init"/><i>rdsaga</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="art"><par n="a_init"/><i></i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bacart"><par n="b_init"/><i>aca</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="calafort"><par n="c_init"/><i>alafo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cárt"><par n="c_init"/><i>á</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ceannfort"><par n="c_init"/><i>eannfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciafart"><par n="c_init"/><i>iafa</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="claífort"><par n="c_init"/><i>laífo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="críochfort"><par n="c_init"/><i>ríochfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dragart"><par n="d_init"/><i>raga</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dronbhacart"><par n="d_init"/><i>ronbhaca</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dúnfort"><par n="d_init"/><i>únfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="fíonghort"><par n="f_init"/><i>íongho</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="foslongfort"><par n="f_init"/><i>oslongfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hart"><i>ha</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iógart"><par n="i_init"/><i>óga</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="longfort"><i>longfo</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="luibhghort"><i>luibhgho</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mart"><par n="m_init"/><i>a</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mort"><par n="m_init"/><i>o</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="neamart"><i>neama</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="port"><par n="p_init"/><i>o</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pórt"><par n="p_init"/><i>ó</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sagart"><par n="s_init"/><i>aga</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="saorphort"><par n="s_init"/><i>aorpho</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="slíogart"><par n="s_init"/><i>líoga</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sórt"><par n="s_init"/><i>ó</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spórt"><par n="s_init"/><i>pó</i><par n="saga/rt__n"/></e>
